Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-915
Zoning regulations; changes; procedure; ratification.

(1) When any city of the first or second class or any village has enacted zoning regulations in accordance with statutory authority and as a part of such regulations has bounded and defined the various zoning or building districts with reference to a zoning map such zoning or building districts may from time to time, be changed, modified or terminated, or additional or different zoning or building districts may from time to time be created, changed, modified or terminated, by an appropriate amendatory action which describes the changed, modified, terminated or created zone or district or part thereof by legal description or metes and bounds, or by republishing a part only of the original zoning map, and without republishing the original zoning map as a part of the amendatory action and without setting forth and repealing the entire section or ordinance adopting the rezoning maps, or a part of the zoning map, as a part of the amendatory action, notwithstanding the provisions of section 16-404 or 17-614.

(2) When any city of the first or second class or any village has, prior to March 21, 1969, changed the boundaries of a zoning or building district without compliance with section 16-404 or 17-614, any such amendments of the zoning ordinances shall stand as valid and subsisting amendments until repealed and the action of any such city or village in executing any such amendment is expressly ratified by the Legislature.

Laws 1969, c. 108, § 1, p. 509;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 21.